Mississippi, session 2026, SB2648.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  The Mississippi State University Extension Service is hereby authorized and empowered to assist poultry farmers in the state of Mississippi in the development of Comprehensive Nutrient Management Plans (CNMPs), as required by federal and state laws and regulations. (2)  The assistance provided under Section 1 of this act, may include, but is not limited to, technical guidance, on-site evaluations, nutrient management planning and the preparation of documents necessary to comply with applicable environmental regulations. (3)  The provisions of this act shall not be construed to require the Mississippi State University Extension Service to provide such services without adequate funding, nor shall the provisions preclude the pursuit of funding through subsequent appropriations or partnerships. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.